Rhode Island statutes. Title 22 General Assembly
Chapter 7.2 Permanent Joint Committee on Highway Safety

22-7.2-1.
Permanent committee — Composition.

There is created a permanent joint committee of the general assembly on highway safety to consist of eleven (11) members of the general assembly, six (6) of whom shall be from the house of representatives to be appointed by the speaker, not more than four (4) of whom shall be from the same political party; five (5) of whom shall be from the senate, to be appointed by the president of the senate, not more than three (3) of whom shall be from the same political party. Vacancies shall be filled in like manner as the original appointments. The members of the joint committee on highway safety shall serve so long as they shall remain members of the house from which they were appointed and until their successors are duly appointed and qualified.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 285, § 1; P.L. 1999, ch. 105, § 16; P.L. 2001, ch. 180, § 26.

22-7.2-2.
Selection of officers.

Upon organization of the joint committee, by majority vote, one of their members shall be chosen as chairperson, another of their members shall be chosen vice-chairperson, and another of their members shall be chosen as secretary.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 285, § 1.

22-7.2-3.
Duties.

It shall be the duty of this joint committee to promote the development and conduct of a coordinated state highway safety program to reduce traffic accidents and the deaths, injuries, and property damage which occur in those accidents.

To this end, the joint committee shall consult and counsel with the director of transportation, the several agencies of state and municipal government, and any agencies of federal government and others that are now or may become concerned with, or responsible for the development and promulgation of programs in accordance with uniform and/or special standards concerned with, but not limited to, provisions for an effective accident records system, measures calculated to improve driver performance, vehicle safety, highway design and maintenance, traffic control, and study and analysis of traffic for detection and correction of high or potentially high accident locations.

The joint committee is authorized to assist and cooperate with those state and other agencies concerned with laws and ordinances, traffic accident records, education, engineering, motor vehicle administration, police traffic supervision, traffic courts, public information, organized citizen support, research, and health, medical care, and transportation of the injured as outlined in the action program of the president’s committee for traffic safety, and further, to assist and cooperate with federal departments and agencies and parties, to increase highway safety and reduce the grievous loss of life, the painful hardship of injuries, and the serious economic and emotional losses resulting from highway accidents.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 285, § 1.

22-7.2-4.
Reports and recommendations.

The joint committee on highway safety shall from time to time and at least annually report to the general assembly on its findings and the results of its studies and make any recommendations to the general assembly and propose any legislation or initiate any studies that it shall deem advisable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 285, § 1.

22-7.2-5.
Technical assistance.

The joint committee shall, if it finds it cannot obtain the proper assistance from available sources, contract for any technical services that it shall require to effectuate its purposes.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 285, § 1.

22-7.2-6.
References to committee.

Each branch of the legislature shall refer to the joint committee, either initially or after action by other committees, all bills and resolutions dealing with or affecting highway safety.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 285, § 1.

22-7.2-7.
Place of meeting — Quorum.

The joint committee on legislative services shall provide adequate space in the state house for the use of the joint committee on highway safety; provided, however, that the joint committee on highway safety may conduct hearings and hold meetings elsewhere when doing so will better serve its purposes. A majority in number of the joint committee on highway safety shall be necessary to constitute a quorum for the transaction of business.

History of Section.

P.L. 1966, ch. 285, § 1.